Hawaii statutes.
[§311D-3] Appointment of compact
commissioner. As required by article VIII of the compact, the state
superintendent of education shall recommend, with the approval of the board of
education, the compact commissioner, who shall be responsible for the administration
and management of the State's participation in the compact. [L 2009, c 152, pt
of §1; am L 2011, c 82, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next